Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5096.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1a. Except as otherwise explicitly required by state or federal law, a department or agency of this state shall not promulgate or enforce a rule that regulates vapor products, including, but not limited to, a rule that applies a condition, restriction, or standard to vapor products or the manufacture or sale of vapor products that is different than a condition, restriction, or standard that is applied to any other product sold in this state.